Hawaii statutes.
§268-11 Liability for damages as to persons
or property. In case of property loss or damage, personal injuries or
death resulting from the operation of any ferry or terminal by the department
of transportation, any person or the personal representative of any person
shall, subject to and to the extent hereinafter provided, have a right of
action against the department for the damage, loss, injury, or death. [L 1963,
c 186, §10; Supp, §114-10; HRS §268-11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next